District of Columbia statutes.
14-501

Proof of record.

An exemplification of a record under the hand of the keeper of the record, and the seal of the court or office where the record is made, is good and sufficient evidence to prove a record made or entered in any State, territory, commonwealth or possession of the United States. The certificate of the person purporting to be the keeper of the record, accompanied by the seal, is prima facie evidence of that fact.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 520
Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
1973 Ed., § 14-501.
1981 Ed., § 14-501.
Public Utilities Commission, transcribed copy of proceedings, admissibility as evidence, see § 43-622.
Insurance superintendent, effect of authentication of papers, see § 31-4301.
Fraternal benefit association, original policies of liability of successor corporation as prima facie evidence upon division of insurance business, see § 31-5725.
Fraternal benefit association, articles of association as prima facie evidence of existence and due incorporation, see § 31-5709.
Domestic life insurance company, presumptive evidence of facts contained in stock book, see § 31-4415.
Department of Insurance and Securities Regulation records, certified copies as evidence, see § 3-3616.
Corporate stock books, presumptive evidence of facts, see § 29-201.26.
Certificate of incorporation, presumptive evidence of facts stated in certified copies, see § 29-201.36.